Missouri, session 2026, HB3282.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 537.035, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 537.035, to read as follows:
537.035. 1. As used in this section, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the
following words and terms shall have the meanings indicated:
(1) "Health care professional", a physician or surgeon licensed under the provisions
of chapter 334, or a dentist licensed under the provisions of chapter 332, or a podiatrist
licensed under the provisions of chapter 330, or an optometrist licensed under the provisions
of chapter 336, or a pharmacist licensed under the provisions of chapter 338, or a chiropractor
licensed under the provisions of chapter 331, or a psychologist licensed under the provisions
of chapter 337, or a nurse licensed under the provisions of chapter 335, or a physician
assistant licensed under the provisions of chapter 334, or a social worker licensed under
the provisions of chapter 337, or a professional counselor licensed under the provisions of
chapter 337, or a mental health professional as defined in section 632.005, while acting within
their scope of practice;
(2) "Peer review committee", a committee of health care professionals with the
responsibility to evaluate, maintain, or monitor the quality and utilization of health care
services or to exercise any combination of such responsibilities.
2. A peer review committee may be constituted as follows:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3282 2
(1) Comprised of, and appointed by, a state, county or local society of health care
professionals;
(2) Comprised of, and appointed by, the partners, shareholders, or employed health
care professionals of a partnership or professional corporation of health care professionals, or
employed health care professionals of a university or an entity affiliated with a university
operating under chapter 172, 174, 352, or 355;
(3) Appointed by the board of trustees, chief executive officer, or the organized
medical staff of a licensed hospital, or other health facility operating under constitutional or
statutory authority, including long-term care facilities licensed under chapter 198, or an
administrative entity of the department of mental health recognized pursuant to the provisions
of subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 630.407;
(4) Any other organization formed pursuant to state or federal law authorized to
exercise the responsibilities of a peer review committee and acting within the scope of such
authorization;
(5) Appointed by the board of directors, chief executive officer or the medical
director of the licensed health maintenance organization.
3. Each member of a peer review committee and each person, hospital governing
board, health maintenance organization board of directors, and chief executive officer of a
licensed hospital or other hospital operating under constitutional or statutory authority, chief
executive officer or medical director of a licensed health maintenance organization who
testifies before, or provides information to, acts upon the recommendation of, or otherwise
participates in the operation of, such a committee shall be immune from civil liability for such
acts so long as the acts are performed in good faith, without malice and are reasonably related
to the scope of inquiry of the peer review committee.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the interviews, memoranda,
proceedings, findings, deliberations, reports, and minutes of peer review committees, or the
existence of the same, concerning the health care provided any patient are privileged and shall
not be subject to discovery, subpoena, or other means of legal compulsion for their release to
any person or entity or be admissible into evidence in any judicial or administrative action for
failure to provide appropriate care. Except as otherwise provided in this section, no person
who was in attendance at any peer review committee proceeding shall be permitted or
required to disclose any information acquired in connection with or in the course of such
proceeding, or to disclose any opinion, recommendation, or evaluation of the committee or
board, or any member thereof; provided, however, that information otherwise discoverable or
admissible from original sources is not to be construed as immune from discovery or use in
any proceeding merely because it was presented during proceedings before a peer review
committee nor is a member, employee, or agent of such committee, or other person appearing

HB 3282 3
before it, to be prevented from testifying as to matters within his personal knowledge and in
accordance with the other provisions of this section, but such witness cannot be questioned
about testimony or other proceedings before any health care review committee or board or
about opinions formed as a result of such committee hearings. The disclosure of any
interview, memoranda, proceedings, findings, deliberations, reports, or minutes to any person
or entity, including but not limited to governmental agencies, professional accrediting
agencies, or other health care providers, whether proper or improper, shall not waive or have
any effect upon its confidentiality, nondiscoverability, or nonadmissibility.
5. The provisions of subsection 4 of this section limiting discovery and admissibility
of testimony as well as the proceedings, findings, records, and minutes of peer review
committees do not apply in any judicial or administrative action brought by a peer review
committee or the legal entity which formed or within which such committee operates to deny,
restrict, or revoke the hospital staff privileges or license to practice of a physician or other
health care providers; or when a member, employee, or agent of the peer review committee or
the legal entity which formed such committee or within which such committee operates is
sued for actions taken by such committee which operate to deny, restrict or revoke the
hospital staff privileges or license to practice of a physician or other health care provider.
6. Nothing in this section shall limit authority otherwise provided by law of a health
care licensing board of the state of Missouri to obtain information by subpoena or other
authorized process from peer review committees or to require disclosure of otherwise
confidential information relating to matters and investigations within the jurisdiction of such
health care licensing boards.
✔